Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1046.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 901 of Title 4, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:





Req. No. 10329 Page 1


A. There is hereby created the Oklahoma Spay and Neuter Grant


Program which shall be overseen and carried out by the Oklahoma


Department of Agriculture, Food and Forestry.


B. The purpose of this program is to reduce animal shelter


overpopulation and cat and dog euthanasia rates by financing grants


to local governments and animal welfare organizations for programs


that most efficiently and effectively facilitate and promote the


provision of spay and neuter services for cats and dogs in the


state.


C. Grants shall be awarded by the Department based upon the


recommendation of the of the Oklahoma Spay and Neuter Grant Program


Advisory Board.


D. The Oklahoma Spay and Neuter Grant Program Advisory Board


shall consist of:


1. The Commissioner of Agriculture, Food and Forestry, or his


or her designee; and


2. The following members, who shall be appointed by the


Commissioner Agriculture, Food and Forestry:


a. one representative of a private animal shelter located


in Oklahoma,


b. one Oklahoma veterinarian,


c. one representative of an Oklahoma animal control


agency, and



Req. No. 10329 Page 2


d. two representatives of animal welfare advocacy


organizations.


E. The Commissioner of Agriculture, Food and Forestry shall


designate the chair of the Board.


F. Members of the Board:


1. May not receive compensation as a member of the Board; and


2. Are entitled to reimbursement for expenses related to


travel.


G. The Board shall advise the Department with respect to:


1. The administration of the Oklahoma Spay and Neuter Grant


Program;


2. The solicitation and evaluation of competitive grant


proposals;


3. The creation of additional standards for grant proposals;


4. Additional relevant data that the Department should require


from local animal shelters and appropriate animal control


organizations; and


5. Any other appropriate matter with respect to the


implementation of this program in the discretion of the Department.


H. Grants may be sought by local governments or animal welfare


organizations to facilitate and promote the provisions of spay and


neuter services for cats and dogs by submitting a competitive grant


proposal to the Oklahoma Department of Agriculture, Food and


Forestry.

Req. No. 10329 Page 3


I. A competitive grant proposal:


1. Shall target low-income communities and populations to the


maximum extent possible and detail how that goal is to be


accomplished;


2. May target feral cat populations if the Department


determines that this targeting does not violate local law;


3. Shall efficiently and effectively facilitate and promote the


provisions of spay and neuter services for cats and dogs; and


4. May include public education and outreach components.


J. The Department shall evaluate a competitive grant proposal


based on:


1. The standards established under subsection I of this


section; and


2. Any additional standards the Department promulgates by rule


consistent with this section.


K. The Department shall promulgate rules to promulgate this act


which shall include requiring a grant recipient to report relevant


information on how the grant was used, including data on the number


and type of spay or neuter surgeries performed and a description of


any public education and outreach implemented.


SECTION 2. There is hereby appropriated to the Oklahoma


Department of Agriculture, Food and Forestry from any monies not


otherwise appropriated from the Special Cash Fund of the State


Treasury for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, the sum of Zero

Req. No. 10329 Page 4


Dollars ($0.00) or so much thereof as may be necessary to implement


the Oklahoma Spay and Neuter Grant Program, as authorized by Section


of this act.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.




60-1-10329 JL 12/16/24





































Req. No. 10329 Page 5